Nevada, session 83, AB511.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 689A.0475 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0475 If any policy of health insurance provides coverage
for acupuncture performed by a physician, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for acupuncture performed by] or a person who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 634A of NRS [.] and performs
acupuncture on the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the acupuncture performed.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 2. NRS 689A.048 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.048 If any policy of health insurance provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
the practice of a qualified psychologist, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatments by] or a licensed psychologist [.] who
provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 3. NRS 689A.0483 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.0483 If any policy of health insurance provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a licensed marriage and family therapist or licensed
clinical professional counselor, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatment by] or a marriage and family therapist
or clinical professional counselor who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided.
Sec. 4. NRS 689A.0485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.0485 If any policy of health insurance provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
the practice of a licensed associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for
treatment by] or an associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS [.]
and who provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 5. NRS 689A.0487 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.0487 1. If any policy of health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of practice of a qualified podiatrist, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatments by] or a podiatrist who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 635 of NRS [.] and who provides such
treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a podiatrist to a number less than
for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a podiatrist to an amount
less than that reimbursed for similar treatments by other physicians.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 6. NRS 689A.049 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.049 1. If any policy of health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of practice of a qualified chiropractic physician, the insured
[is entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a chiropractic
physician who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of NRS [.] and
who provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a chiropractic physician to a
number less than for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a chiropractic physician to
an amount less than that reimbursed for similar treatments by other
physicians.
Sec. 7. NRS 689A.0493 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.0493 If any policy of health insurance provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor, the
insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatment by] or a clinical
alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to chapter
641C of NRS [unless] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided, including, without limitation, if the clinical
alcohol and drug counselor must be directly reimbursed pursuant to:
1. An assignment of benefits described in NRS 687B.409; or
2. Any other applicable assignment of benefits.
Sec. 8. NRS 689A.0495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.0495 1. If any policy of health insurance provides
coverage for services which are within the authorized scope of
practice of a registered nurse who is authorized pursuant to chapter
632 of NRS to perform additional acts in an emergency or under
other special conditions as prescribed by the State Board of Nursing,
and which are reimbursed when provided by another provider of
health care, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for services
provided by such] or a registered nurse [.] who provides such
services to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement
for the services provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services provided by such a registered nurse to
a number of occasions less than for services provided by another
provider of health care.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by such a registered
nurse to an amount less than that reimbursed for similar services
provided by another provider of health care.
3. An insurer is not required to pay for services provided by
such a registered nurse which duplicate services provided by another
provider of health care.
Sec. 9. NRS 689B.038 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.038 If any policy of group health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of the practice of a qualified psychologist, the insured [is
entitled to reimbursement for treatment by] or a licensed
psychologist [.] who provides such treatment to the insured, as
applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 10. NRS 689B.0383 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0383 If any policy of group health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of practice of a licensed marriage and family therapist or
licensed clinical professional counselor, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatment by] or a marriage and family therapist
or clinical professional counselor who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided.
Sec. 11. NRS 689B.0385 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0385 If any policy of group health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of the practice of a licensed associate in social work, a social
worker, a master social worker, an independent social worker or a
clinical social worker, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for
treatment by an associate in social work,] or a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS [.]
and who provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 12. NRS 689B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.039 1. If any group policy of health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of practice of a qualified chiropractic physician, the insured
[is entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a chiropractic
physician who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of NRS [.] and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
who provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a chiropractic physician to a
number less than for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a chiropractic physician to
an amount less than that charged for similar treatments by other
physicians.
Sec. 13. NRS 689B.0393 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0393 1. If any group policy of health insurance
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of practice of a qualified podiatrist, the insured [is
entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a podiatrist who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 635 of NRS [.] and who provides such
treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a podiatrist to a number less than
for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a podiatrist to an amount
less than that reimbursed for similar treatments by other physicians.
Sec. 14. NRS 689B.0397 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0397 If any policy of group health insurance provides
coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized
scope of practice of a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor,
the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatment by] or a
clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 641C of NRS [unless] and who provides such treatment to
the insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided, including, without limitation, if the clinical
alcohol and drug counselor must be directly reimbursed pursuant to:
1. An assignment of benefits described in NRS 687B.409; or
2. Any other applicable assignment of benefits.
Sec. 15. NRS 689B.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.045 1. If any group policy of health insurance provides
coverage for services which are within the authorized scope of
practice of a registered nurse who is authorized pursuant to chapter
632 of NRS to perform additional acts in an emergency or under
other special conditions as prescribed by the State Board of Nursing,
and which are reimbursed when provided by another provider of
health care, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for services
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
provided by such] or a registered nurse [.] who provides such
services to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement
for the services provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services provided by such a registered nurse to
a number of occasions less than for services provided by another
provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by such a registered
nurse to an amount less than that reimbursed for similar services
provided by another provider of health care.
3. An insurer is not required to pay for services provided by
such a registered nurse which duplicate services provided by another
provider of health care.
Sec. 16. NRS 689B.049 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.049 If any policy of group health insurance provides
coverage for acupuncture performed by a physician, the insured [is
entitled to reimbursement for acupuncture performed by] or a
person who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634A of NRS [.] and
performs acupuncture on the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the acupuncture performed.
Sec. 16.5. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person insured under a contract for hospital, medical or
dental services may assign his or her right to benefits to the
provider of health care who provided the services covered by the
contract. The nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service
corporation shall pay all the benefits or the part of the benefits
assigned by the insured to the person designated by the insured. A
payment made pursuant to this subsection discharges the
obligation of the corporation to pay those benefits.
2. If the insured makes an assignment under this section, but
the corporation after receiving a copy of the assignment pays the
benefits to the insured, the corporation shall also pay those
benefits to the provider of health care who received the assignment
as soon as the corporation receives notice of the incorrect
payment.
3. For the purpose of this section, “provider of health care”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 17. NRS 695B.1951 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1951 1. If any contract for hospital or medical services
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of practice of a qualified podiatrist, the insured [is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a podiatrist who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 635 of NRS [.] and who provides such
treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a podiatrist to a number less than
for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a podiatrist to an amount
less than that reimbursed for similar treatments by other physicians.
Sec. 18. NRS 695B.1955 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1955 If any contract for hospital or medical service
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of practice of a licensed clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatment
by] or a clinical alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 641C of NRS [unless] and who provides such
treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided, including, without
limitation, if the clinical alcohol and drug counselor must be
directly reimbursed pursuant to:
1. An assignment of benefits described in NRS 687B.409; or
2. Any other applicable assignment of benefits.
Sec. 19. NRS 695B.196 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.196 If any contract for hospital or medical services
provides coverage for acupuncture performed by a physician, the
insured [is entitled to reimbursement for acupuncture performed by]
or a person who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634A of NRS [.]
and performs acupuncture on the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the acupuncture performed.
Sec. 20. NRS 695B.197 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.197 If any contract for hospital or medical service
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of the practice of a qualified psychologist, the
insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a licensed
psychologist [.] who provides such treatment to the insured, as
applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 21. NRS 695B.1973 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1973 If any contract for hospital or medical service
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of practice of a licensed marriage and family
therapist or licensed clinical professional counselor, the insured [is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
entitled to reimbursement for treatment by] or a marriage and family
therapist or clinical professional counselor who is licensed pursuant
to chapter 641A of NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided.
Sec. 22. NRS 695B.1975 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1975 If any contract for hospital or medical service
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of the practice of a licensed associate in social
work, social worker, master social worker, independent social
worker or clinical social worker, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatment by] or an associate in social work,
social worker, master social worker, independent social worker or
clinical social worker who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of
NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the insured, as
applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 23. NRS 695B.198 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.198 1. If any contract for hospital or medical service
provides coverage for treatment [of an illness] which is within the
authorized scope of practice of a qualified chiropractic physician,
the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatments by] or a
chiropractic physician who is licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of
NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the insured, as
applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a chiropractic physician to a
number less than for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a chiropractic physician to
an amount less than that charged for similar treatments by other
physicians.
Sec. 24. NRS 695B.199 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.199 1. If any contract for medical service provides
coverage for services which are within the authorized scope of
practice of a registered nurse who is authorized pursuant to chapter
632 of NRS to perform additional acts in an emergency or under
other special conditions as prescribed by the State Board of Nursing,
and which are reimbursed when provided by another provider of
health care, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for services
provided by such] or a registered nurse [.] who provides such
services to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement
for the services provided.
2. The terms of the contract must not limit:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(a) Coverage for services provided by such a registered nurse to
a number of occasions less than for services provided by another
provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by such a registered
nurse to an amount less than that reimbursed for similar services
provided by another provider of health care.
3. An insurer is not required to pay for services provided by
such a registered nurse which duplicate services provided by another
provider of health care.
Sec. 24.5. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person insured under a health care plan may assign his
or her right to benefits to the provider of health care who provided
the services covered by the plan. The health maintenance
organization shall pay all the benefits or the part of the benefits
assigned by the insured to the person designated by the insured. A
payment made pursuant to this subsection discharges the
obligation of the health maintenance organization to pay those
benefits.
2. If the insured makes an assignment under this section, but
the health maintenance organization after receiving a copy of the
assignment pays the benefits to the insured, the health
maintenance organization shall also pay those benefits to the
provider of health care who received the assignment as soon as the
insurer receives notice of the incorrect payment.
3. For the purpose of this section, “provider of health care”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 25. NRS 695C.1765 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1765 If any evidence of coverage provides coverage for
acupuncture performed by a physician, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for acupuncture performed by] or a person who is
licensed pursuant to chapter 634A of NRS [.] and performs
acupuncture on the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the acupuncture performed.
Sec. 26. NRS 695C.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.177 If any evidence of coverage provides coverage for
treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of the
practice of a qualified psychologist, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatments by] or a licensed psychologist [.] who
provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Sec. 27. NRS 695C.1773 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1773 If any evidence of coverage provides coverage for
treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a licensed marriage and family therapist or licensed
clinical professional counselor, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatment by] or a marriage and family therapist
or clinical professional counselor who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS [.] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided.
Sec. 28. NRS 695C.1775 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1775 If any evidence of coverage provides coverage for
treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of the
practice of a licensed associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker, the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for
treatment by] or an associate in social work, a social worker, a
master social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical
social worker who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS [.]
and who provides such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is
entitled to reimbursement for the treatment provided.
Sec. 29. NRS 695C.178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.178 1. If any evidence of coverage provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a qualified chiropractic physician, the insured [is entitled
to reimbursement for treatments by] or a chiropractic physician who
is licensed pursuant to chapter 634 of NRS [.] and who provides
such treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a chiropractic physician to a
number less than for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a chiropractic physician to
an amount less than that charged for similar treatments by other
physicians.
Sec. 30. NRS 695C.1783 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1783 1. If any evidence of coverage provides coverage
for treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a qualified podiatrist, the insured [is entitled to
reimbursement for treatments by] or a podiatrist who is licensed
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
pursuant to chapter 635 of NRS [.] and who provides such
treatment to the insured, as applicable, is entitled to
reimbursement for the treatment provided.
2. The terms of the policy must not limit:
(a) Coverage for treatments by a podiatrist to a number less than
for treatments by other physicians.
(b) Reimbursement for treatments by a podiatrist to an amount
less than that reimbursed for similar treatments by other physicians.
Sec. 31. NRS 695C.1789 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1789 If any evidence of coverage provides coverage for
treatment [of an illness] which is within the authorized scope of
practice of a licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor, the
insured [is entitled to reimbursement for treatment by] or a clinical
alcohol and drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to chapter
641C of NRS [unless] and who provides such treatment to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the
treatment provided, including, without limitation, if the clinical
alcohol and drug counselor must be directly reimbursed pursuant to:
1. An assignment of benefits described in NRS 687B.409; or
2. Any other applicable assignment of benefits.
Sec. 32. NRS 695C.179 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.179 1. If any evidence of coverage provides coverage
for services which are within the authorized scope of practice of a
registered nurse who is authorized pursuant to chapter 632 of NRS
to perform additional acts in an emergency or under other special
conditions as prescribed by the State Board of Nursing, and which
are reimbursed when provided by another provider of health care,
the insured [is entitled to reimbursement for services provided by
such] or a registered nurse [.] who provides such services to the
insured, as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the services
provided.
2. The terms of the evidence of coverage must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services provided by such a registered nurse to
a number of occasions less than for services provided by another
provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by such a registered
nurse to an amount less than that reimbursed for similar services
provided by another provider of health care.
3. An insurer is not required to pay for services provided by
such a registered nurse which duplicate services provided by another
provider of health care.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Sec. 33. NRS 608.1575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1575 1. If an employer provides health benefits for his or
her employees which include coverage for services which are within
the authorized scope of practice of a registered nurse who is
authorized pursuant to chapter 632 of NRS to perform additional
acts in an emergency or under other special conditions as prescribed
by the State Board of Nursing, and which are reimbursed when
provided by another provider of health care, the [employees are
entitled to reimbursement for services provided by such] employee
or a registered nurse [.] who provides such services to an employee,
as applicable, is entitled to reimbursement for the services
provided.
2. The benefits provided by the employer must not limit:
(a) Coverage for services provided by such a registered nurse to
a number of occasions less than for services provided by another
provider of health care.
(b) Reimbursement for services provided by such a registered
nurse to an amount less than that reimbursed for similar services
provided by another provider of health care.
3. The employer is not required to pay for services provided by
such a registered nurse which duplicate services provided by another
provider of health care.
Sec. 34. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)